Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1326
Property exempt from act.

Sections 69-1301 to 69-1329 shall not apply to any property that has been presumed abandoned or escheated under the laws of another state prior to December 25, 1969.

Laws 1969, c. 611, § 26, p. 2490;

Laws 1978, LB 859, § 1.